Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-384
Failure to make report; penalty.

Any person who willfully fails to make any report required by the Adult Protective Services Act shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 37.